Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4392.
People of the State of Michigan enact: part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for certain capital outlay projects for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, from the following funds: CAPITAL OUTLAY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 41,766,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102.  MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Trust fund acquisition projects by priority: Lamberts Trail Park Acquisition, Kent County (grant-in-aid to city of Kentwood) (#24-0070) $ 129,100 Little Huron River Acquisition, Marquette County (#24-0179) 1,175,000 Munising Bay Overlook Acquisition, Alger County (grant-in-aid to city of Munising) (#24-0100) 619,000 For Fiscal Year Ending Sept. 30, 2025 City of Burton Community Park Acquisition, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to City of Burton) (#24-0128) $ 1,275,000 Waterloo Recreation Area Addition, Jackson County (#24-0105) 1,000,000 Muskegon State Game Area Acquisition, Muskegon County (#24-0119) 595,000 Sturgeon River Sloughs Acquisition, Houghton County (#24-0120) 440,000 Michigamme Highlands Conservation Easement Acquisition, Marquette County (#24-0180) 4,200,000 Turtle Woods Nature Preserve Acquisition, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to Oakland County) (#24-0047) 2,175,000 Jefferson Wetland Preserve Acquisition, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to Chesterfield Township) (#24-0044) 560,000 Southeastern Michigan Regional Sprint Land Consolidation, Oakland County (#24-0117) 2,000,000 Jewel Golf Course Acquisition, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to city of Grand Blanc) (#24-0228) 1,500,000 Cornish State Game Area Acquisition, Van Buren County (#24-0118) 1,140,000 Man-Made Lake Parcel Acquisition, Manistee County (grant-in-aid to city of Manistee) (#24-0185) 94,000 Pinckney Recreation Area Addition, Livingston County (#24-0144) 1,300,000 Roberts Park Expansion Acquisition, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to Thomas Township) (#24-0048) 48,000 Main Street Park Project Acquisition, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to city of Chelsea) (#24-0080) 1,012,500 Trust fund development projects by priority: Bailey Park Restroom Facility, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to city of Battle Creek) (#24-0024) 290,800 Lake Michigan Adventure Canopy Tour Addition, Muskegon County (#24‑0140) 400,000 Riverfront Park Boat Launch Improvements, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to City of Buchanan) (#24-0129) 231,000 Rogue River Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to village of Sparta) (#24-0098) 281,400 Frances River Lot Improvements, Ingham County (grant-in-aid to city of Lansing) (#24-0013) 400,000 Two Rivers Park River Access, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Kent County) (#24-0173) 400,000 Johnson Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Kent County) (#24‑0171) 400,000 Thompsonville Multi-Use Trailhead and Campground, Benzie County (grant-in-aid to village of Thompsonville) (#24-0049) 276,600 Ottaway Crossing Footbridge, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to Grand Traverse County) (#24-0096) 400,000 Mid Michigan Pathway Extension, Isabella County (grant-in-aid to city of Mt. Pleasant) (#24-0126) 400,000 Rotary Park Pavilion and Fishing Dock, Branch County (grant-in-aid to city of Coldwater) (#24-0099) 400,000 Historic Bridge Park Accessibility Improvements, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to Calhoun County) (#24-0043) 400,000 North Branch Park Boat Launch Renovation, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to Calhoun County) (#24-0199) 222,000 Idema Explorers Trail Eastmanville Connector Project, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Ottawa County) (#24-0045) 400,000 Otterburn Park Infrastructure Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to city of Swartz Creek) (#24-0061) 290,000 For Fiscal Year Ending Sept. 30, 2025 Lincoln Township Beach Improvements, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to Lincoln Township) (#24-0077) $ 350,000 Mason County Picnic Area Trail and Trailhead Improvements, Mason County (grant-in-aid to Mason County) (#24-0139) 400,000 South Front Street Park Renovation, Cass County (grant-in-aid to city of Dowagiac) (#24-0082) 300,000 Oscoda Beach Park Boardwalk and Beach Access Improvements, Iosco County (grant-in-aid to Oscoda Township) (#24-0094) 400,000 Red Woolfe Park Improvements, Van Buren County (grant-in-aid to village of Decatur) (#24-0110) 307,300 Lake Street Fishing Pier Development, Antrim County (grant-in-aid to village of Central Lake) (#24-0124) 237,500 Swedetown Chalet Renovation and Trail Addition, Houghton County (grant-in-aid to Calumet Township) (#24-0150) 400,000 Heritage Trail Extension to Bewabic State Park, Iron County (grant-in-aid to Crystal Falls Township) (#24-0079) 215,000 Grand Traverse Greenway Development, Genesee County (#24-0103) 300,000 Detroit River Boating Access Site Renovation, Wayne County (#24-0109) 400,000 Springfield Memorial Park Improvements, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to city of Springfield) (#24-0112) 257,500 Barnes Memorial Park Improvements, Wexford County (grant-in-aid to Colfax Township) (#24-0187) 224,000 Bike Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to city of Grand Rapids) (#24-0010) 300,000 Steele Park Development, Ionia County (grant-in-aid to city of Ionia) (#24‑0066) 400,000 Rondo Station Improvements, Kent County (grant-in-aid to city of Kentwood) (#24-0069) 300,000 Austin Lake Trail Project, Kalamazoo County (grant-in-aid to city of Portage) (#24-0081) 400,000 Booth Park Entry and Trail Improvements, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to city of Birmingham) (#24-0122) 400,000 Whitefish Point State Harbor Redevelopment, Chippewa County (#24-0127) 400,000 Nakwema Trail Development, Charlevoix County (#24-0133) 400,000 Bronson Rail Trail, Branch County (grant-in-aid to city of Bronson) (#24‑0155) 387,600 Platte River State Fish Hatchery Accessibility and Education, Benzie County (#24-0114) 400,000 Hartwick Pines Old Growth Exhibit Development, Crawford County (#24‑0191) 400,000 Patterson Avenue and 76th Street Pathway Project, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Caledonia Township) (#24-0196) 400,000 Minard Mills Park Renovation, Jackson County (grant-in-aid to Jackson County) (#24-0037) 200,000 School Section Lake Bathhouse and Playground Renovation, Mecosta County (grant-in-aid to Mecosta County) (#24-0042) 400,000 Black River Bridge Replacement - High Country Pathway, Otsego County (#24-0141) 400,000 Intervale-Roselawn Playground - Joe Louis Greenway, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to city of Detroit) (#24-0146) 400,000 Clark Park - Joe Louis Greenway, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to city of Detroit) (#24-0147) 250,000 Thurston Park Improvements - Kayak Launch, Antrim County (grant-in-aid to village of Central Lake) (#24-0194) 193,700 For Fiscal Year Ending Sept. 30, 2025 Nature Park Kayak Launch, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to Flushing Township) (#24-0063) $ 207,200 Eddy Park Campground - Camper Shelters Project, Gogebic County (grant-in-aid to city of Wakefield) (#24-0008) 274,200 McQuisten Recreational Area Renovation, Alger County (grant-in-aid to Munising Township) (#24-0039) 300,000 Delta Mills Park to Hawk Meadow Park Pathway, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to Delta Township) (#24-0055) 400,000 Boyne City Park Improvements, Charlevoix County (grant-in-aid to city of Boyne City) (#24-0090) 322,000 3-Mile Trail Extension, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to East Bay Township) (#24-0131) 400,000 Dixboro Road Pathway Connection, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to Ann Arbor Township) (#24-0152) 300,000 Winstrom Park Trails and Natural Area Improvements, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Park Township) (#24-0157) 326,700 Central Riverside Park Improvements, Ionia County (grant-in-aid to city of Belding) (#24-0211) 397,500 Lewis Emery Park Development, Hillsdale County (grant-in-aid to Hillsdale County) (#24-0054) 255,500 Lake Huron Coastal Preserve - Accessibility Improvements, Iosco County (grant-in-aid to Alabaster Township) (#24-0059) 191,000 Pere Marquette Conservation Entry and Trail Project, Mason County (grant-in-aid to Pere Marquette Township) (#24-0174) 400,000 Mundy Miracle Commons Accessible Playscape and Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to Mundy Township) (#24-0198) 400,000 Ocqueoc Outdoor Center - Dock and Path Improvements, Presque Isle County (grant-in-aid to Presque Isle County) (#24-0091) 144,300 Boyle Lake Boating Access Site Improvements, Berrien County (#24-0116) 90,000 Crystal Waters State Game Area Access Development, Monroe County (#24‑0028) 400,000 Mill Creek Park Enhancements, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to city of Dexter) (#24-0085) 400,000 Shaw Park Playground and Cricket Field, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to city of Warren) (#24-0020) 400,000 Grand Ledge Ball Park Improvements, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to city of Grand Ledge) (#24-0035) 346,500 Au Gres Riverfront Campground Improvements, Arenac County (grant-in-aid to city of Au Gres) (#24-0095) 400,000 Eagle Harbor Beach Accessibility Project, Keweenaw County (grant-in-aid to Eagle Harbor Township) (#24-0123) 83,700 Marquette Greenway Development, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to New Buffalo Township) (#24-0218) 300,000 Lake Township Park Development, Roscommon County (grant-in-aid to Lake Township) (#24-0014) 400,000 Spindler Park Improvements, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to city of Eastpoint) (#24-0203) 350,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Michigan natural resources trust fund 41,766,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2025 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $41,766,000 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $26,326,000. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: Acquisition grants-in-aid $ 7,412,600.00 Development grants-in-aid 18,913,400.00 Total payments to locals $ 26,326,000.00 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be expended for utility scale solar or wind development projects. MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Sec. 301. (1) The department of natural resources shall enter into agreements with local units of government to administer the grants identified in part 1. Among other provisions, the agreements must require that grant recipients do all of the following: (a) Dedicate to public outdoor recreation uses in perpetuity the land acquired or developed. (b) Replace lands converted or lost to other than public outdoor recreation use. (c) For parcels acquired that are larger than 5 acres, provide this state with a nonparticipating 1/6 minimum royalty interest in any acquired minerals that are retained by the grant recipient. (2) The agreements under subsection (1) must also provide that the full payments of grants be made only after proof of acquisition, or proof of completion of a development project, is submitted by the grant recipient and all costs are verified by the department of natural resources. This requirement may be waived by the department of natural resources. Sec. 302. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay shall be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 303. (1) The state share of the capital outlay appropriations authorized in 2022 PA 151 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund projects that have since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Skyline Recreation Area - Inholding Acquisition, Emmet County (grant-in-aid to City of Petoskey) (#21-0108) $ 187,500 Midland-Freeland Path Connector Acquisition, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to Tittabawassee Township) (#21-0080) 71,300 (2) The state share of the capital outlay appropriation authorized in 2023 PA 119 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund project that has since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Crow Island State Game Area addition, Bay County (#22-0135) $ 1,300,000 (3) The state share of the capital outlay appropriation authorized in 2024 PA 135 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund project that has since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Johnson Nature Center Preserve Expansion, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to Bloomfield Hills Schools) (#23-0184) $ 890,000 (4) Any money lapsed under subsection (1), (2), or (3) is available for reappropriation. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor